ro-RO: Stilul de rejansă al perdelei: Cu rejansă ascunsă; Pliu tip cutie; Cu pliuri cilindrice; Ochi/capse; Cu agățători ascunse; Cu pliuri tip creion; Perdea cu pliuri evantai; Perdea cu bride și inele; Cu pliuri ondulate; Cu tub pentru galerie; Cu bride; Cu funde; Altele
de: Stil des Vorhangkopfs: Rückseitige Schlaufen; Kastenfalte; Kelchfalte; Ösenfalte; Unsichtbare Aufhängung; Bleistiftfalte; Quetschfalte; Gardinenring; Wellenfalte; Stangenaussparung; Schlaufen; Kräuselband; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 窗帘头款式: 后袢带; 箱褶式; 高脚杯褶; 垫圈/孔眼; 暗扣带; 铅笔褶; 捏褶; 穿环式; 波纹褶; 穿杆式; 顶袢带; 系带式; 其他
zh-TW: 窗簾頭樣式: 背帶; 箱型褶; 高腳杯褶; 銅釦/雞眼套片; 隱藏拉環; 鉛筆褶; 折景簾; 頂環; 波浪簾; 穿桿式; 背帶窗簾; 綁帶式; 其他
en: Curtain heading style: Back tab; Box pleat; Goblet pleat; Grommet/eyelet; Hidden tab; Pencil pleat; Pinch pleat; Ring top; Ripple fold; Rod pocket; Tab top; Tie top; Other
hu: függöny rögzítési stílusa: Hátsó fül; Szögletesen redőzött; Kehely formájú redő; Átvezető gyűrű/szem; Rejtett behúzószalag; Ceruza formájú redő; Bevarrt redő; Karikák; Hullámos hajtás; Behúzószalag; Pántok; Megkötők; Egyéb
el: Στυλ κεφαλής κουρτίνας: Τιράντες; Κουφόπιετα; Πτυχές κυπέλλου; Τρουκ; Κρυφές θηλιές; Πτυχές μολυβιού; Πτυχές Pinch; Στρογγυλά τρουκ; Πτυχή κυματισμού; Τούνελ για κουρτινόξυλο; Επάνω τιράντες; Γραβάτα; Άλλο
nl: Gordijnophangstijl: Verborgen lussen; Kokerplooi; Gobletplooi; Oogjes/grommets; Verborgen inzet; Potloodplooi; Knijpplooi; Ringtop; Golfplooi; Gordijnophanging; Met lussen; Striktop; Overig
ja: カーテンヘッダーのスタイル: バックタブ; ボックスプリーツ; ゴブレットプリーツ; グロメット/アイレット; 隠しタブ; ペンシルプリーツ; ピンチプリーツ; リングトップ; リップルフォールド; ロッドポケット; タブトップ; タイトップ; その他
th: สไตล์หัวผ้าม่าน: แบบซ่อนหูผ้าไว้ด้านหลัง; จีบแบบกล่อง; แบบจับจีบเป็นทรงกลม; แบบตาไก่; แบบห่วงซ่อน; แบบจับจีบคล้ายดินสอ; แบบจับจีบเย็บตรึงไว้ด้านบน; แบบใส่ห่วงตาไก่ที่ด้านบน; แบบลอนโค้งมนต่อเนื่องเป็นคลื่น; แบบร้อยท่อ; แบบเย็บห่วงผ้าไว้ที่ด้านบนสุด; แบบผูกเป็นโบว์; อื่นๆ
fi: Verhon yläreunan ripustustyyli: Takakiinnitys; Lautalaskos; Goblet-laskostus; Rengas/silmukka; Piilolenkki; Lyijykynärypytys; Puristettu rypytys; Rengastus; Aaltorypytys; Tankotunneli; Nauhakaulus; Solmittava; Muu
sl-SI: Slog zgornjega dela zavese: Zavihek nazaj; Pravokotna guba; Peharska guba; Oko/ušesce; Skrite zanke; Svinčnik gube; Stisnjena guba; Vrh obroča; Valovita guba; Rokav za palico; Zgornji del zavihka; Vrh z zavezovanjem; Druga
hr-HR: Stil zaglavlja zavjese: Stražnje omče; Nabor u obliku kvadrata; Nabor u obliku pehara; Ušica/petlja; Skrivena šipka; Nabori u obliku olovke; Uvučeni nabori; Prstenasti vrh; Valoviti nabor; Džep za štap; Gornji dio s petljama; Gornji dio s vezanjem; Ostalo
ru: Тип верхней кромки шторы: Задний язычок; Бантовые складки; Складка-бокал; Люверс/петля; Потайные петли; Складка-карандаш; Складка-зажим; Верх с кольцами; Волнообразная складка; Кулиска; Верх с петлями; Верх с завязками; Другое
pl: Typ górnej krawędzi zasłony: Tylna zakładka; Zakładki pudełkowe; Fałda gobelinowa; Przelotki / oczka; Ukryte szlufki; Fałda ołówkowa; Fałda pinch pleat; Na kółkach; Fałda marszczona; Tunel na karnisz; Na zakładki; Na troczki; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Estilo de cabeçalho de cortina: Passante traseiro; Prega macho; Prega em forma de cálice; Ilhós; Aba oculta; Prega lápis; Prega de pinça; Topo em anel; Dobra ondulada; Bolso para haste; Alça de tecido; Topo com amarração; Outro
sv: Stilen på gardinens överkant: Bakflik; Boxveck; Kupveck; Öljett; Dold flik; Pennveck; Nypveck; Ringtopp; Vågveck; Stavficka; Fliktopp; Knyttopp; Övrigt
lt-LT: Užuolaidos viršaus (pakabinimo) tipas: Atgalinis skirtukas; Dėžutinė klostė; Taurės klostė; Žiedinė kilpa/kilpa; Užmaunamos; Pieštuko klostė; Žnyplinė klostė; Žiedo viršus; Banguotas lenkimas; Užmaunamos užuolaidos; Kilpinis viršus; Raišteliais tvirtinamas viršus; Kita
es: Estilo de la cabecera de la cortina: Pestaña trasera; Con pliegues; Pliegue de copa; Ojal; Pestaña oculta; Pliegue de lápiz; Pliegue de pinza; Parte superior del anillo; Pliegue ondulado; Bolsillo para barra; Pestaña superior; Corbata superior; Otros
nb: Gardintopp-stil: Bakre fane; Boksfold; Pokalfold; Malje/malje; Skjult hempe; Blyantfold; Klemfold; Ringtopp; Ripplefold; Stanglomme; Fane øverst; Knutetopp; Annet
it: Stile del bordo superiore della tenda: Passante posteriore; Pieghe a scatola; Piega a calice; Passante/occhiello; Risvolto invisibile; Piega a matita; Piega a pizzico; Anello superiore; Piega a onda; Tasca per asta; Passante superiore; Con lacci superiori; Altro
ko: 커튼 상단 주름 스타일: 백탭; 박스 플리츠; 고블렛 플리츠; 그로밋/아일렛; 숨겨진 탭; 펜슬 플리츠; 핀치 플리츠; 링탑; 리플 폴드; 막대 포켓; 탭탑; 타이탑; 기타
fr: Finition supérieure du rideau: Ourlet à patte arrière; Pli creux; Plis godet; Œillet/œillets métalliques; Onglet masqué; Plis crayon; Plis pincé; Anneau supérieur; Pli ondulé; Passe-tringle; Passants; Liens à nouer; Autre
pt-PT: Estilo de cabeçal de cortina: Separador traseiro; Com pregas; Prega em forma de cálice; Ilhós; Presilha escondida; Prega lápis; Prega de pinça; Topo em anel; Dobra ondulada; Costura no varão; Separador superior; Topo com atilhos; Outro
cs: Styl horního okraje záclony: Skrytá poutka; Skrytý sklad; Řasení ve tvaru poháru; Průchodky/očka; Skrytá poutka; Tužkové řasení; Šitý sklad; Kroužky; Vlnové řasení; Tunel (kapsa) na tyč; S poutky; Vázací poutka; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип горна лента на завеса: Перделик; Кутиеви гънки; Плисе тип „чаша“; Халки/отвор; Скрита лента; Плисе тип „молив“; Гънки тип „щипка“; С халки; Вълнисто сгъване; С джоб за корниз; Перделик с ленти; Перделик с връзки; Друго
sk-SK: Štýl horného okraja záclony: S pútkami na zadnej strane; Obojstranné plisovanie; Kalichové riasenie; Priechodka/očko; Skrytá karta; Ceruzkové riasenie; Riasenie na trojzáhyb; Zavesenie na krúžky; Vlnité riasenie; Otvor na prevlečenie tyče; Pútka na prednej strane; S viazacími šnúrkami; Iné
da: Gardins ophængsstil: Bagstrop; Dobbeltfold; Goblet pleat; Strop/øje; Skjult fane; Pencil pleat; Pinch pleat; Ringtop; Bølgefold; Stanglomme; Øvre strop; Bindetop; Andet
tr: Perde başlığı stili: Arka tırnaklı; Kutu pile; Goblet pile; Halka / Kuşgözü; Gizli geçirmeli; Kalem pileli; Büzgülü pile; Halka başlıklı; Dalgalı katlamalı; Boru tünelli; Askı bantlı; Üstten bağlamalı; Diğer
vi: Kiểu may đầu rèm: Quai treo mặt sau; Xếp ly hộp; Nếp gấp hình ly; Lỗ xỏ dây/khuy; Thanh treo ẩn; Nếp gấp xếp ly nhỏ; Nếp gấp chụm; Kiểu treo vòng; Nếp gấp lượn sóng; Bọc thanh treo; Kiểu quai treo; Kiểu dây buộc; Khác